Arkansas statutes. Constitution Of The State Of Arkansas Of 1874
AMEND. 74.
SCHOOL TAX — BUDGET — APPROVAL OF TAX RATE (CONST., ART. 14, § 3, AS AMENDED BY CONST. AMEND. 11 AND CONST. AMEND. 40, AMENDED).

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2005, No. 1242, § 1, provided:

“(a)

The Constitutional Issues Subcommittee of the House Interim Committee on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs and a subcommittee of the Senate Interim Committee on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs shall jointly conduct a study of property taxes relative to the impact of Amendments 59, 74, and 79 to the Arkansas Constitution.

“(b)

The subcommittees shall complete the study and make their findings and recommendations to the House Interim Committee on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs and the Senate Interim Committee on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs by October 31, 2006.”

Publisher's Notes.

This amendment amended Ark. Const., Art. 14, § 3, and is incorporated within that section. The amendment was proposed by S.J.R. 10 during the 1995 Regular Session and adopted at the general election on November 5, 1996, by a vote of 407,719 for and 378,017 against.